Donald Trump|Speech: Donald Trump in Roanoke, VA|July 25, 2016

Thank you everybody. Thank you everybody. Thank you everybody Your Honor. This is a great honor, great Your Honor. This is a great honor, great Your Honor. This is a great honor. Great state. I have a lot of property, a lot state. I have a lot of property, a lot state. I have a lot of property, a lot people in Virginia pay a lot of checks.
People in Virginia pay a lot of checks. People in Virginia pay a lot of checks, Bing every night, every day, a lot of Bing every night, every day, a lot of Bing every night, every day, a lot of great success I've had in Virginia over great success I've had in Virginia over great success. I've had in Virginia over the years and we have just phenomenal the years and we have just phenomenal the years and we have just phenomenal stuff in Loudoun County as you know and stuff in Loudoun County as you know and stuff in Loudoun County as you know And we have down in Charlottesville some we have down in Charlottesville, some we have down in Charlottesville, some other stuff, a tremendous, tremendous other stuff, a tremendous, tremendous other stuff, a tremendous, tremendous, beautiful property.
Charlottesville is beautiful property, Charlottesville is beautiful, property Charlottesville is right next to Thomas Jefferson. It was an right next to Thomas Jefferson. It was an right next to Thomas Jefferson. It was an architect, you know, he had great taste, he architect, you know, he had great taste.
He architect, you know, he had great taste, he had great taste, he understood that some had great taste. He understood that some had great taste. He understood that some of the most beautiful land I've ever of the most beautiful land I've ever of the most beautiful land. I've ever seen, so I love Virginia and we are going seen.
So I love Virginia and we are going seen. So I love Virginia and we are going to win Virginia. I'm going to go over some of the - I'm going to go over some of the - I'm going to go over some of the statistics when Tim Cain was governor statistics when Tim Cain was governor statistics when Tim Cain was governor, they're not pretty - they're not pretty - they're Not pretty - they're not pretty - they're not pretty - they're not pretty.
But before I do, I just want to say that. But before I do, I just want to say that. But before I do, I just want to say that debbie Wasserman Schultz. I always knew she was highly overrated. I - I always knew she was highly overrated. I - I always knew she was highly overrated. I hope not good, but she just got fired.
Hope not good, but she just got fired. Hope not good, but she just got fired. They said, Debbie, you're fired get out. They said, Debbie, you're fired get out. They said, Debbie, you're fired get out there be out boom, boy, they were how there be out boom? Boy, they were how there be out boom? Boy, they were.
How about that for disloyalty though in about that for disloyalty though in about that for disloyalty though in terms of Hillary Clinton or friends terms of Hillary Clinton or friends terms of Hillary Clinton or friends? Because Debbie wasserman-schultz because Debbie wasserman-schultz because Debbie wasserman-schultz has been so much for Hillary Clinton and has been so much for Hillary Clinton and has been so much for Hillary Clinton.
And as for why these politicians, Fox, other as for why these politicians, Fox, other as for why these politicians Fox other than Mike Pence, of course, he's great but than Mike Pence, of course, he's great but than Mike Pence, of course, he's great. But these politicians, hillier, these politicians, hillier, these politicians, hillier love life.
So there's no loyalty there, love life. So there's no loyalty there, love life. So there's no loyalty there, right? There's no loyalty, right? There's no loyalty, right? There's no loyalty, none whatsoever. It gets a little heat, none whatsoever. It gets a little heat, none whatsoever. It gets a little heat and they fire her get out of here, get and they fire her, get out of here, get and they fire her, get out of here, get out of here.
First, she knew what was out of here. First, she knew what was out of here. First, she knew what was going on. Hillary Clinton knew what was going on. Hillary Clinton knew what was going on. Hillary Clinton knew what was going on. She knew everything that was going on. She knew everything that was going on.
She knew everything that was going on. She knew it's a rigged system going on. She knew it's a rigged system going on. She knew it's a rigged system that Bernie Sanders never had a chance that Bernie Sanders never had a chance that Bernie Sanders never had a chance. Okay? He never had a chance. And if you, okay, he never had a chance.
And if you - okay, he never had a chance. And if you look at it, look what's going on, they're look at it, look, what's going on, they're look at it, look what's going on. They're having a lot of people marching now, a, having a lot of people marching now, a, having a lot of people marching now a lot of those people that are vote for us, lot of those people that are vote for us, lot of those people that are Vote for us, I'll tell you right now a lot of them and not even because they like me or and not even because they like me or and not even because they like me or they don't like me, although I have to, they don't like me.
Although I have to - they don't like me, although I have to see, have you seen the polls, it just came see, have you seen the polls, it just came see, have you seen the polls, it just came out from right. We had like the biggest out from right, we had like the biggest out from, right. We had like the biggest bounce that anyone can remember.
They bounce that anyone can remember they bounce that anyone can remember, they said well, if he gets out of the said well, if he gets out of the said well, if he gets out of the convention with no bounce, that will be a convention with no bounce. That will be a convention with no bounce that will be a success.
Do we have nine points or success? Do we have nine points or success? Do we have nine points or something, something something ten points we're leaving, we're actually ten points we're leaving. We're actually ten points we're leaving. We're actually leading in the polls leading in the polls leading in the polls and the CNN poll was so good I may have.
And the CNN poll was so good I may have and the CNN poll was so good. I may have to start liking them again. I don't know to start liking them again. I don't know to start liking them again. I don't know. They treat me unfairly, but you know they treat me unfairly, but you know they treat me unfairly. But you know what's more important the poll but you what's more important the poll but you what's more important the poll, but you know the big ball, the big poll that's know the big ball, the big poll that's know the big ball, the big poll that's November 8th, that's the poll we care November 8th.
That's the poll we care November 8th. That's the poll we care about. But look out disloyal, kruky and about - but look out disloyal, kruky and about - but look out disloyal, kruky and Hillary Clinton was to somebody that put Hillary Clinton was to somebody that put Hillary Clinton was to somebody that put her life on the line.
I mean, she - what she her life on the line, I mean she what she her life on the line. I mean, she - what she did in order to take advantage of Bernie did in order to take advantage of Bernie did in order to take advantage of Bernie Sanders in all of the supporters, debbie Sanders, in all of the supporters, debbie Sanders, in all of the supporters.
Debbie Wasserman what she did in order to make Wasserman what she did in order to make Wasserman what she did in order to make sure that the system, the rigged system, sure that the system, the rigged system, sure that the system, the rigged system stays intact. And Hillary gets it and stays intact and Hillary gets it and stays intact and Hillary gets it.
And then you see the emails, can you imagine then you see the emails, can you imagine then you see the emails, can you imagine they talk about religion, they talk about, they talk about religion, they talk about, they talk about religion, they talk about religion. Can you imagine if that was my religion, can you imagine if that was my religion, can you imagine if that was my ID right now be on the front page of ID right now be on the front page of ID right now be on the front page Of every newspaper would be horrible and every newspaper would be horrible and every newspaper would be horrible and they're trying to play it down well that they're trying to play it down well that they're trying to play it down.
Well, that wasn't so bad that wasn't so bad, no, but wasn't so bad that wasn't so bad, no, but wasn't so bad that wasn't so bad, no. But could you imagine there's such a - could you imagine there's such a - could you imagine there's such a different standard? So here's the story, different standard, so here's the story, different standard.
So here's the story. It's a story. So Debbie was totally loyal. It's a story. So Debbie was totally loyal. It's a story. So Debbie was totally loyal to Hillary and Hillary threw her under a - to Hillary and Hillary threw her under a - to Hillary and Hillary threw her under a bus and it didn't take her more than bus and it didn't take her more than bus.
And it didn't take her more than five minutes to make that decision. Man I five minutes to make that decision. Man I five minutes to make that decision. Man, I don't want her covering my back. I'll don't want her covering my back. I'll don't want her covering my back. I'll tell you right now that's true, tell you right now that's true.
Tell you right now that's true. It's true. Now the other thing I'm - it's true now. The other thing I'm - it's true now. The other thing I'm surprised that, you know, it's nice when surprised that, you know, it's nice when surprised that, you know, it's nice when you're not reading speeches, isn't it, you're not reading speeches, isn't it?
You're not reading speeches, isn't it really? Because I can talk about current really because I can talk about current really because I can talk about current events. This stuff happened ten minutes events, this stuff happened, ten minutes events, this stuff happened ten minutes ago. You know, if you're reading speeches ago, you know, if you're reading speeches ago, you know, if you're reading speeches, I see these guests I dealt with a lot of - I see these guests, I dealt with a lot of - I see these guests, I dealt with a lot Of them, I've actually been a very political them.
I've actually been a very political them. I've actually been a very political person, all my life. I've always been on person all my life. I've always been on person all my life. I've always been on the other side. But now for fourteen the other side, but now for fourteen the other side, but now for fourteen months, I've been doing this and I like months I've been doing this and I like months I've been doing this and I like this side in a certain way better.
This side in a certain way better this side in a certain way better because we can do things better. They because we can do things better, they because we can do things better. They used to love me when I was just to used to love me. When I was just to used to love me, when I was just to contribute, I'd give millions of dollars contribute.
I'd give millions of dollars contribute. I'd give millions of dollars just I was a contributing. No, I know we just - I was a contributing, no, I know we just - I was a contributing, no, I know we know I like this better. I like I like know I like this better. I like I like know I like this better, I like I like being non-establishment better, but with being non-establishment better, but with being non-establishment better.
But with Bernie, when you look at what happened, Bernie, when you look at what happened, Bernie, when you look at what happened, the thing that surprises me most is how the thing that surprises me most is how the thing that surprises me most is how we folded. He folded, I thought he was, we folded he folded, I thought he was, we folded he folded.
I thought he was really hanging out tough, tough, tough, really hanging out tough, tough, tough, really hanging out tough, tough, tough then they find these horrible emails. Then they find these horrible emails. Then they find these horrible emails talking about his religion and dizzy talking about his religion and dizzy talking about his religion and dizzy Jewish.
And is he an atheist and won and Jewish? And is he an atheist and won and Jewish? And is he an atheist and won and that's not going to play well and sir, that's not going to play well. And sir, that's not going to play well. And sir man, that's rough and that's not as bad man, that's rough and that's not as bad man.
That's rough and that's not as bad as some of the other ones. And I said as some of the other ones, and I said as some of the other ones, and I said there's no way that Bernie Sanders shows. There's no way that Bernie Sanders shows there's no way that Bernie Sanders shows up to make a speech. There's no way that up to make a speech.
There's no way that up to make a speech. There's no way that he can ever endorse crooked Hillary. He can ever endorse crooked. Hillary. He can ever endorse crooked Hillary Clinton anymore, right? There's no way and Clinton anymore, right? There's no way and Clinton anymore, right? There's no way. And today I see him today.
I see him today. I see him trying to make the case and his own trying to make the case and his own trying to make the case and his own people are out there booing, okay? They're - people are out there booing, okay? They're - people are out there booing, okay? They're out. Their bone, so it's pretty bad then out their bone.
So it's pretty bad then out their bone. So it's pretty bad. Then I'll tell you, I'll tell you, I'll tell you, Hillary Clinton, I've been saying this. Hillary Clinton, I've been saying this, Hillary Clinton, I've been saying this for a long time and I got it from Bernie for a long time and I got it from Bernie for a long time and I got it from Bernie Sanders, cuz.
He said she suffers from bad Sanders cuz, he said she suffers from bad Sanders cuz. He said she suffers from bad judgment, right? Bad judgment. She suffers judgment, right, bad judgment. She suffers judgment right, bad judgment. She suffers from very bad judgment. Her instincts are from very bad judgment.
Her instincts are from very bad judgment. Her instincts are bad. They're no good. Her instincts are bad. They're no good. Her instincts are bad. They're no good. Her instincts are defective. Her instincts are defective defective. Her instincts are defective defective. Her instincts are defective, but she's got, she's low-energy, she, but she's got, she's low-energy, she, but she's got, she's low-energy, she actually is live.
She'll go home, she'll take a nap for she'll go home. She'll take a nap for she'll go home. She'll take a nap for four or five hours and she'll come back four or five hours and she'll come back four or five hours and she'll come back no naps for Trump no. Now I don't take no naps for Trump. No. Now I don't take no naps for Trump, no.
Now I don't take that. We don't have time. We don't have that. We don't have time. We don't have that. We don't have time. We don't have tongue. You ever see Hillary, where she tongue, you ever see Hillary, where she tongue, you ever see Hillary where she comes out and she'll read a teleprompter comes out and she'll read a teleprompter comes out and she'll read a teleprompter for a little while.
Let you go home. You for a little while, let you go home you for a little while. Let you go home, you know, see her for three, four days, then know see her for three, four days, then know see her for three, four days, then she comes back and then they used to I she comes back and then they used to I - she comes Back and then they used to - I remember and I would put like three or remember and I would put like three or remember and I would put like three or four people really nice people in there.
Four people, really nice people in there. Four people really nice people in there sitting around a little table and sitting around a little table and sitting around a little table and everyone saying, well, I'd like to ask her everyone saying, well, I'd like to ask her everyone saying, well, I'd like to ask her A question, no, no, no, you're too tough a question.
No, no, no, you're too tough a question. No, no, no, you're too tough. This is what we have. How do you think this is what we have? How do you think this is what we have? How do you think Isis is gonna relax? Yeah, I don't think Isis is gonna relax. Yeah, I don't think Isis is gonna relax. Yeah, I don't think so, right.
I don't think so. So right, I don't think so. So right, I don't think so. Not gonna be good now we have tough, not gonna be good now we have tough, not gonna be good now we have tough enemies out there. We have tough mean enemies out there. We have tough mean enemies out there. We have tough mean vicious, horrible, horrible people, these vicious, horrible, horrible people, these vicious, horrible, horrible people.
These are horrible, horrible human beings. We are horrible, horrible human beings. We are horrible, horrible human beings. We need toughness folks. It's about time. We need toughness folks. It's about time. We need toughness folks, it's about time. We need strength, we need toughness, we need need strength, we need toughness, we need need strength.
We need toughness, we need smarts, we need warmth, we need compassion, smarts, we need warmth, we need compassion, smarts. We need warmth, we need compassion, we need everything. We need everything. We need everything. We need everything, we need everything, we need everything, but we don't need somebody that goes, but we don't need somebody that goes.
But we don't need somebody that goes home and takes naps. We don't need naps home and takes naps. We don't need naps home and takes naps. We don't need naps. But what did surprise me was that Bernie, but what did surprise me was that Bernie, but what did surprise me was that Bernie was so soft on us. I really I was amazed was so soft on us.
I really I was amazed was so soft on us. I really - I was amazed because I watched his speech, you know we - because I watched his speech, you know we - because I watched his speech, you know we must vote for Hillary Clinton. I mean the must vote for Hillary Clinton. I mean, the must vote for Hillary Clinton, I mean, the hatred he's got, but why would he do that hatred he's got.
But why would he do that hatred he's got. But why would he do that? He looks better if he didn't do it. To me, he looks better if he didn't do it. To me, he looks better if he didn't do it to me. Hey, what do I have to do with it? I don't - hey, what do I have to do with it? I don't - hey, what do I have to do with it?
I don't care whatever he wants to do, but could care whatever he wants to do, but could care whatever he wants to do. But could you imagine if what's taking place now you imagine if what's taking place now you imagine if what's taking place now with the Democrats took place in with the Democrats took place in with the Democrats took place in Cleveland.
And by the way, I have to tell Cleveland and by the way I have to tell Cleveland and by the way, I have to tell you Cleveland did an amazing job. Thank you. Cleveland did an amazing job. Thank you. Cleveland did an amazing job. Thank You, Ohio. Thank You. Cleveland, what a job You Ohio? Thank You. Cleveland, what a job You Ohio?
Thank You. Cleveland, what a job I spoke to the police chief Calvin did a - I spoke to the police chief Calvin did a - I spoke to the police chief Calvin did a phenomenal job up there. But what - we had phenomenal job up there. But what - we had phenomenal job up there, but what we had and the Secret Service working with the - and the Secret Service, working with the - and the Secret Service, working with the Secret Service, what a job they did, but Secret Service what a job they did.
But Secret Service, what a job they did, but Cleveland is a beautiful place. I mean Cleveland is a beautiful place. I mean Cleveland is a beautiful place. I mean really I was so happy. We had no problem really. I was so happy. We had no problem really. I was so happy we had no problem. So we're trying to show, I know they - so we're trying to show, I know they - so we're trying to show - I know they showed this one square where's this big showed this one square, where's this big showed this one square, where's this big square and that a Few people there bring square and that a few people there bring square and that a few people there bring the cameras in plus you know really the cameras in plus you know really the cameras in plus you know really because they don't want to show all that Because they don't want to show all that because they don't want to show all that beautiful grass, you know, with no people, beautiful grass, you know with no people, beautiful grass, you know with no people on it.
And and you know why, I'll tell you on it. And and you know why, I'll tell you on it and and you know why, I'll tell you why? Because people like our message why? Because people like our message, why? Because people like our message, people like our message, they really like people like our message. They really like people like our message, they really like it.
And if you look at Philadelphia, I it - and if you look at Philadelphia, I it - and if you look at Philadelphia, I went to school in Philadelphia, went to school in Philadelphia, went to school in Philadelphia. I love Philadelphia if you look at - I love Philadelphia, if you look at - I love Philadelphia, if you look at Philadelphia, what they're going through Philadelphia, what they're going through Philadelphia, what they're going through right now looks like a lot of people right now looks like a Lot of people right now looks like a lot of people, it's a hundred degrees in and speaking it's a hundred degrees in and speaking it's a hundred degrees in.
And speaking of that by the way, I don't know if you of that. By the way, I don't know if you of that by the way, I don't know if you saw - did you know I went to the other saw, did you know I went to the other saw, did you know I went to the other room. So you have a second room and then room. So you have a second room and then room.
So you have a second room and then outside you have over a thousand people outside, you have over a thousand people outside, you have over a thousand people and it's a hundred and four degrees out and it's a hundred and four degrees out and it's a hundred. And four degrees out, don't think of it and it's the first don't think of it and it's the first don't think of it and it's the first time I ever did it.
I said let's go - let's time I ever did it. I said, let's go - let's time I ever did it. I said let's go - let's go to the second room first, right? That's go to the second room first, right? That's go to the second room first, right? That's the ante room. But let's go cuz, that's the ante room, but let's go cuz, that's the ante room.
But let's go cuz, that's the overflow room I said. So I went in the overflow room, I said, so I went in the overflow room, I said. So I went in there. We surprised them, we were nice but there we surprised them. We were nice but there we surprised them. We were nice but you know I will love these people but you know I will love these people but you know I will love these people but you know what I also like I have to do, you know what I also like I have to do, you Know what I also like I have to do it later and outside.
We have a lot of people and and outside we have a lot of people and and outside we have a lot of people and I wish said let them in the fire. I wish said, let them in the fire. I wish said, let them in the fire department won't let them in because of department won't let them in because of department won't let them in because of a fire regulation which is very sad.
A fire regulation which is very sad a fire regulation which is very sad because they're outside its - we have because they're outside its we have because they're outside its - we have speakers out there, speakers out there, speakers out there, I think the speakers are burning up. I think the speakers are burning up.
I think the speakers are burning up folks. It is hot. I wish the fire marshal folks, it is hot. I wish the fire marshal folks, it is hot. I wish the fire marshal, where's the fire marshal, is he around it? Where's the fire marshal, is he around it? Where's the fire marshal? Is he around it come on fire, mark, if they could get in come on fire, mark, if they could get in come on fire, mark, if they could get in fire marshal, you know you have doors, fire marshal, you know you have doors, fire marshal, you know You have doors that go right out to the outside.
I that go right out to the outside. I that go right out to the outside. I promise there's nothing like you don't promise. There's nothing like you don't promise. There's nothing like you don't have a problem. I feel badly we have have a problem. I feel badly we have have a problem. I feel badly we have those people.
We have people standing those people, we have people standing those people, we have people standing outside, you could get a few more people outside. You could get a few more people outside, you could get a few more people inside if they could let them in. So inside if they could let them in so inside if they could let them in.
So that's the way a builder would talk, okay, that's the way a builder would talk. Okay, that's the way a builder would talk. Okay? That's the way a building. So you had the - that's the way a building. So you had the - that's the way a building. So you had the firing of the head of the DNC and that firing of the head of the DNC and that firing of the head of the DNC. And that was a vicious firing.
A lot of things was a vicious firing. A lot of things was a vicious firing, a lot of things happen. You had her firing, Hillary happen, you had her firing, Hillary happen, you had her firing, Hillary Clinton's, total disloyalty was at play, Clinton's total disloyalty was at play, Clinton's total disloyalty was at play.
It really was - people don't say that they - it really was - people don't say that they - it really was - people don't say that they won't say that on the media. Oh, if I did, won't say that on the media. Oh, if I did, won't say that on the media - oh, if I did something with rights, can you imagine if something with rights, can you imagine if something with rights, can you imagine if I fired rights, I wouldn't do that, I fired rights.
I wouldn't do that. I fired rights, I wouldn't do that because Rights has done such a great job because Rights has done such a great job because Rights has done such a great job Reince Priebus what a job he has done Reince Priebus what a job he has done Reince Priebus. What a job he has done and I always used to say for months now and I always used to say for months now and I always used to say for months now, I've been saying, I've been saying, I've been saying I'll take rights over Debbie and I'll Take rights over Debbie and I'll take rights over Debbie and everyone said oh, but Debbie's a everyone said oh, but Debbie's a everyone said oh, but Debbie's a superstar said, so his rights and then it superstar said, so his rights and then it superstar said.
So his rights and then it turned out that Debbie flamed out and turned out that Debbie flamed out and turned out that Debbie flamed out and she's gone. But the disloyalty was, she's gone, but the disloyalty was, she's gone. But the disloyalty was incredible. And I really mean that incredible and I really mean that incredible and I really mean that because honestly whether you like her or because honestly whether you like her or because honestly whether you like her or not, she worked very hard to rig the not she worked Very hard to rig the - not she worked very hard to rig the system so that Hillary got it's true system so that Hillary got it's true system so that Hillary got - it's true, right?
That's true. No, it's true, right? That's true. No, it's true, right? That's true. No, it's true. She worked very, very hard to rig the - she worked very, very hard to rig the - she worked very, very hard to rig the system little did she know that China system little, did she know that China system little, did she know that China, Russia, one of our Many, many friends came Russia, one of our many, many friends came Russia, one of our many, many friends came in and hacked the hell out of us.
Can you in and hacked the hell out of us, can you in and hacked the hell out of us? Can you imagine, imagine, imagine, can you imagine what they're hacking? I can you imagine what they're hacking? I can you imagine what they're hacking. I guarantee we'll find the 33,000 emails guarantee. We'll find the 33,000 emails guarantee.
We'll find the 33,000 emails. Why did Hillary get rid of her middle? Why did Hillary get rid of her middle? Why did Hillary get rid of her middle name, huh? Hillary? No. But why did she get name, huh? Hillary? No. But why did she get name, huh? Hillary? No. But why did she get rid of it? Hillary rotten Clinton, rotten rid of it; Hillary rotten Clinton, rotten rid of it; Hillary rotten Clinton, rotten, clean, Hillary rotten Clinton, right, maybe clean, Hillary rotten Clinton, right, maybe clean, Hillary rotten Clinton, right?
Maybe that's why it's too close. No, no, it's too. That's why it's too close. No, no, it's too. That's why it's too close. No, no, it's too close. It's too close. You think Mike close. It's too close. You think Mike close. It's too close. You think Mike Pence would say this. I don't think so Pence would say this, I don't think so.
Pence would say this. I don't think so. By the way, did I do a good job with Mike by the way, did I do a good job with Mike by the way, did I do a good job with Mike Pence? Okay, him and his family what a Pence? Okay, him and his family what a Pence? Okay, him and his family, what a high-quality person.
You know, you have to high-quality person. You know, you have to high-quality person. You know you have to vet people, right, and we vetted Mike and vet people, right, and we vetted Mike and vet people, right? And we vetted Mike and they came back and these are killers, they came back and these are killers, they came back and these are killers, they came back with many pages on.
They came back with many pages on. They came back with many pages on certain people, okay, many pages. I would certain people, okay, many pages. I would certain people, okay, many pages. I would like to read a book many, many pages with like to read a book many, many pages with like to read a book many, many pages with Mike.
They came back with like nothing, Mike. They came back with like nothing, Mike. They came back with like nothing, he's like the most perfect human being. He's like the most perfect human being. He's like the most perfect human being this guy I said, Mike, did you ever do this guy? I said, Mike, did you ever do this guy?
I said, Mike, did you ever do anything wrong in your whole life, anything wrong in your whole life? Anything wrong in your whole life? No, I don't think so. He is - where is he's? No, I don't think so. He is - where is he's? No, I don't think so. He is where is he's the best guy that guy is correct. I love the best guy that guy is correct.
I love the best guy that guy is correct. I love this guy. I love him this guy. I love him this guy. I love him, I love it, but you know what I really - I love it, but you know what I really - I love it, but you know what I really like about Mike. So listen to this to me like about Mike. So listen to this, to me like about Mike, so listen to this, to me a very important thing is her bad.
A very important thing is her bad. A very important thing is her bad judgment now whether you like her choice judgment now, whether you like her choice judgment now, whether you like her choice, tim kaine, nobody even knows who he is. No tim kaine, nobody even knows who he is. No, tim kaine. Nobody even knows who he is.
No, he's done a terrible job for Virginia. I - he's done a terrible job for Virginia. I - he's done a terrible job for Virginia. I assumed they said all he picked her, you assumed they said all he picked her, you assumed they said all he picked her, you know he got picked because of Virginia's know he got picked because of Virginia's know he got picked because of Virginia's Virginia's very important And I'm doing Virginia's very important and I'm doing Virginia's very important and I'm doing very well here.
Hey, hey, I'm employing a very well here. Hey, hey, I'm employing a very well here. Hey, hey, I'm employing a lot of people here and they don't employ lot of people here and they don't employ lot of people here and they don't employ anybody. I spent a lot of money in anybody. I spent a lot of money in anybody.
I spent a lot of money in Potomac Falls, sterling, that area - I mean Potomac Falls sterling that area - I mean Potomac Falls sterling that area, I mean I spent a lot of money, we have great, I spent a lot of money. We have great - I spent a lot of money. We have great, great things happening next year.
We have great things happening next year. We have great things happening next year. We have the Senior PGA Championship coming, the Senior PGA Championship coming, the Senior PGA Championship coming thousands. And thousands of people come thousands and thousands of people come thousands and thousands of people come into Virginia and spend a lot of money into Virginia and spend a lot of money into Virginia and spend a lot of money.
Thank you. I love you too though, but thank you. I love you too though, but thank you. I love you too though, but - but just think of it so Hillary Clinton, but just think of it so Hillary Clinton, but just think of it. So Hillary Clinton has almost a 50 % of the people want a - has almost a 50 % of the people want a - has almost a 50 % of the people want a progressive, okay?
We don't have to like progressive, okay? We don't have to like progressive, okay? We don't have to like that, but that's okay. That's where they that. But that's okay. That's where they that. But that's okay. That's where they are. They want to give everything away. Are they want to give everything away?
Are they want to give everything away and raise your taxes? That's what happens and raise your taxes. That's what happens and raise your taxes. That's what happens? No, no, she will have a tax raise by the no, no, she will have a tax raise by the - no. No, she will have a tax raise. By the way, I have the largest tax cut of way.
I have the largest tax cut of way I have the largest tax cut of anybody running for office Republican or anybody running for office Republican or anybody running for office Republican or Democrat, okay, but Hillary Clinton, Democrat, okay. But Hillary Clinton, Democrat, okay. But Hillary Clinton, Hillary Clinton will have a tax cut that Hillary Clinton will have a tax cut that Hillary Clinton will have a tax cut.
That is not there. It's going to be a tax cut, is not there. It's going to be a tax cut is not there, it's going to be a tax cut times 20 in Reverse like a rocket ship. Times 20 in Reverse like a rocket ship times 20 in Reverse like a rocket ship, we have the biggest tax cut proposal in. We have the biggest tax cut proposal in.
We have the biggest tax cut proposal in the last four years and it's - we're going the last four years and it's - we're going the last four years and it's - we're going to get it through at least we're gonna to get it through at least we're gon Na, to get it through, at least we're gonna get most of it through.
I'll tell you get most of it through. I'll tell you get most of it through. I'll tell you what I'm gonna try and get all of it. What I'm gonna try and get all of it, what I'm gonna try and get all of it through. But we have - and it's policy it's through, but we have and it's policy it's through. But we have - and it's policy, it's, you know, put out there, that doesn't mean, you know, put out there.
That doesn't mean, you know, put out there. That doesn't mean there's not a little negotiation because there's not a little negotiation because there's not a little negotiation because we're gonna have to negotiate. But we're - we're gonna have to negotiate. But we're - we're gonna have to negotiate. But we're gonna have it go, Hillary Clinton's going gonna, have it go, Hillary Clinton's going gonna, have it go, Hillary Clinton's going to have one of the biggest tax increases to have one of the biggest tax increases to have one of the biggest tax Increases in the history of our country because in the history of our country, because in the history of our country, because what she's proposing, you're gonna have what she's proposing.
You're gonna have what she's proposing. You're gonna have to pay for a very simple, very simple now to pay for a very simple, very simple now to pay for a very simple, very simple. Now maybe she'll, you know, after she gets her, maybe she'll, you know, after she gets her, maybe she'll. You know, after she gets her to Bernie, get rid of all this, stuff it to Bernie, get rid of all this, stuff it to Bernie, get rid of all this stuff.
It doesn't help you by the way, but what doesn't help you by the way, but what doesn't help you by the way, but what she's proposing, she needs to have a - she's proposing, she needs to have a - she's proposing, she needs to have a massive, massive tax Increase now nobody massive massive tax increase now nobody massive massive tax increase.
Now nobody ever talks about that. Do you notice she ever talks about that? Do you notice she ever talks about that? Do you notice she never talks about who's gonna pay for? It never talks about who's gonna pay for. It never talks about who's gonna pay for it. Now they're gonna pay, but just now they're gonna pay, but just now they're gonna pay.
But just statistically, she's gonna need a very statistically. She's gonna need a very statistically, she's gonna need a very major tax cut. But here's something to me, major tax cut. But here's something to me, major tax cut. But here's something to me that's very interesting. 50 % of that, that's very interesting.
50 % of that, that's very interesting. 50 % of that party is Bernie Sanders almost and party is Bernie Sanders almost and party is Bernie Sanders almost and they're very passion and that's a much - they're very passion and that's a much - they're very passion and that's a much more passionate side, her people.
They more passionate side her people, they more passionate side her people. They fall asleep. Okay? They fall asleep, fall asleep okay? They fall asleep, fall asleep okay? They fall asleep. They're watching her with Bernie's. They're watching her with Bernie's. They're watching her with Bernie's people.
They're really out there. They say people, they're really out there. They say people, they're really out there. They say what you want about. Bernie Sanders he what you want about. Bernie Sanders he what you want about. Bernie Sanders, he got it on free trade. He got it free, got it on free trade, he got it, free, got it on free trade, he got it, free trade.
Now I'm totally - I'm a free trader trade now. I'm totally - I'm a free trader trade now. I'm totally - I'm a free trader, I believe in free trade. You know they I believe in free trade, you know they I believe in free trade, you know they get it all wrong because they just don't get it all wrong because they just don't get it all wrong because they just don't say it properly.
But I want smart read, I say it properly, but I want smart read, I say it properly, but I want smart read, I want - I want to trade with other want. I want to trade with other want. I want to trade with other countries, but I don't want to lose five countries, but I don't want to lose five countries, but I don't want to lose five hundred billion dollars a year with hundred billion dollars a year with hundred billion dollars a year with China.
Thank you, China. We love you very China. Thank you. China, we love you very China. Thank you. China, we love you very much, but we're not going to lose five much, but we're not going to lose five much, but we're not going to lose five hundred billion dollars, hundred billion dollars, hundred billion dollars.
And I don't want to have a trade and I don't want to have a trade and I don't want to have a trade imbalance with Japan where they send us imbalance with Japan where they send us imbalance with Japan where they send us millions of cars. And we send them some millions of cars and we send them some millions of cars and we send them some beef and then they send it back right beef and then they send it back right beef and then they send it back, right.
And then they - we send some wheat, wheat and then they - we send some wheat, wheat and then they - we send some wheat wheat, they send cars, we send wheat, sounds like they send cars, we send wheat, sounds like they send cars, we send wheat, sounds like we Got ta send a lot of wheat, right, the - we got ta send a lot of wheat, right, the - we got ta send a lot of wheat, right, the trader balance is massive and with trader balance is massive and with trader balance is massive.
And with Mexico, we have an unbelievably big trade. Mexico, we have an unbelievably big trade. Mexico, we have an unbelievably big trade amount, so they kill us at the border amount, so they kill us at the border amount. So they kill us at the border, they kill us, they're killing us at the - they kill us, they're killing us at the - they kill us, they're killing us at the border and we have one of the biggest border and we have one of the biggest border and We have one of the biggest trade imbalances and what happens, what trade imbalances and what happens, what trade imbalances and what happens, what happens happens happens, I'm not even including the drugs, right?
I'm not even including the drugs, right? I'm not even including the drugs, right. The drugs are pouring across. You know I - the drugs are pouring across. You know I - the drugs are pouring across. You know I won the state of New Hampshire and I got won the state of New Hampshire and I got won the state of New Hampshire and I got very, very friendly with the people in very, very friendly with the people in very, very friendly with the People in New Hampshire, I'll never forget them, New Hampshire, I'll never forget them.
New Hampshire, I'll never forget them because that's an amazing group of - because that's an amazing group of - because that's an amazing group of people. And I said what's your biggest people? And I said what's your biggest people and I said what's your biggest problem? They said heroin pouring across problem.
They said heroin pouring across problem. They said heroin pouring across the southern border. I said heroin New, the southern border, I said heroin New, the southern border, I said heroin New Hampshire because you look at New Hampshire because you look at New Hampshire because you look at New Hampshire, it's so beautiful with the Hampshire, it's so beautiful with the Hampshire.
It's so beautiful with the lakes and the little beautiful roads and lakes and the little beautiful roads and lakes and the little beautiful roads and the trees and the forests. I say you the trees and the forests, I say you the trees and the forests, I say you don't heroine I said you have - they said don't heroine.
I said you have - they said don't heroine. I said you have, they said mr. Trump, you have no idea. It's one of mr. Trump, you have no idea. It's one of mr. Trump. You have no idea. It's one of the worst areas for that. It comes the worst areas for that. It comes the worst areas for that. It comes pouring across the southern border.
I pouring across the southern border, I pouring across the southern border. I said you know what, if I win, I'm gonna said, you know what if I win, I'm gonna said, you know what, if I win, I'm gonna sit, I'm gonna fix that problem. Well I am sit I'm gonna fix that problem. Well, I am sit I'm gonna fix that problem, well I am going to fix that problem.
I'm gonna fix going to fix that problem. I'm gonna fix going to fix that problem. I'm gonna fix that problem. And one of the ways I that problem and one of the ways I that problem and one of the ways I appreciate that, you know, I always like appreciate that. You know, I always like appreciate that. You know, I always like to say if I went because honestly life to say if I went, because honestly life to say if I went, because honestly life is a very strange thing and things and I is a very strange thing and things.
And I is a very strange thing and things and I don't want to be arrogant because I don't want to be arrogant because I don't want to be arrogant because I don't want to be accused by them of don't want to be accused by them of don't Want to be accused by them of being arrogant. So I'll say if - but it being arrogant.
So I'll say if - but it being arrogant. So I'll say if - but it better be when or I'm gonna be very better be when or I'm gonna be very better be when or I'm gonna be very angry at you folks from Virginia from angry at you folks from Virginia from angry at You folks from Virginia, from Virginia, but the folks in New Hampshire, Virginia, but the folks in New Hampshire, Virginia, but the folks in New Hampshire and you're having the same problems, but - and you're having the same problems, but - and you're having the same problems, but they're having It for whatever reason they're having it for whatever reason they're having it for whatever reason disproportionately badly heroin is disproportionately badly heroin is disproportionately badly heroin is pouring across the border and it's going pouring across the border and it's going pouring across the border and it's going A lot of it's going all over the country, a lot of it's going all over the country, a lot of it's going all over the country.
By the way. Everybody's got the problem. By the way, everybody's got the problem. By the way, everybody's got the problem. You buy it for less than a candy bar and you buy it for less than a candy bar and you buy it for less than a candy bar. And our youth is being poisoned and plenty. Our youth is being poisoned.
And plenty, our youth is being poisoned and plenty of other people, but our youth is being of other people, but our youth is being of other people. But our youth is being poisoned by this stuff, heroin heroin and poisoned by this stuff, heroin heroin and poisoned by this stuff, heroin heroin and what we're going to do, thank you.
And what we're going to do, thank you. And what we're going to do. Thank you. And what we're going to do is, first of all, what we're going to do is, first of all, what we're going to do is, first of all, the Border Patrol agents, the Border Patrol agents, the Border Patrol agents endorsed me 16,500. They've never done endorsed me 16,500. They've never done endorsed me 16,500, they've never done that and their job is easier now without that and their job is easier now without that and their job is easier now without Trump, their job is easier without Trump Trump, their job is easier without Trump Trump their Job is easier without Trump because you know right now they just end because you know right now they just end because you know right now they just end and people go by and these are great and people go by and these are great and people go by And these are great people.
I got to know him very well. The people I got to know him very well. The people I got to know him very well. The Border Patrol agents want to do their Border Patrol agents want to do their Border Patrol agents want to do their job. It's a much tougher job, probably a job. It's a much tougher job, probably a job.
It's a much tougher job, probably a much more dangerous job. Would you stop much more dangerous job? Would you stop much more dangerous job? Would you stop people and say, sorry folks, boom go back people and say, sorry folks boom go back people and say, sorry folks boom go back. But that's more dangerous than saying, but that's more dangerous than saying.
But that's more dangerous than saying you know we can't do anything. It's you know we can't do anything. It's you know we can't do anything. It's called stand back, stand back and leave called stand back, stand back and leave called stand back stand back and leave them alone and let them walk right in them alone and let them walk right in them alone and let them walk right in how stupid are We - how stupid are we, okay, how stupid are we?
How stupid are we? Okay, how stupid are we? How stupid are we? Okay. So I spoke to them now when they - so I spoke to them now when they - so I spoke to them now when they endorsed me and I said - so let me ask you endorsed me and I said - so let me ask you endorsed me and I said So let me ask you a wall how important they said mr.
Trump a wall, how important they said mr. Trump a wall, how important they said. Mr. Trump, it's very, very important, very - and they - it's very, very important, very - and they - it's very, very important, very - and they know they know, see I just saved a know they know, see I just saved a know, they know, see I just saved a million dollars.
Somebody else would go million dollars, somebody else would go million dollars. Somebody else would go out and hire a consultant who knows out and hire a consultant who knows out and hire a consultant who knows nothing. They come in from Harvard, they'd nothing - they come in from Harvard, they'd nothing - they come in from Harvard, they'd spend about a year at the border.
They spend about a year at the border. They spend about a year at the border. They learn, nothing learn, nothing learn, nothing they then write this 2,000 page report. They then write this 2,000 page report. They then write this 2,000 page report that nobody will read. They'll charge you that nobody will read.
They'll charge you that nobody will read. They'll charge you one million dollars for the report and one million dollars for the report and one million dollars for the report and you have no idea what just happened. As you have no idea what just happened. As you have no idea what just happened as opposed to saying like I did with the opposed to saying like I did with the opposed to saying like I did with the Border Patrol is a wall good.
They said Border Patrol is a wall good. They said Border Patrol is a wall good, they said very good. They actually used an very good - they actually used an very good - they actually used an interesting expression. They said it's a interesting expression. They said it's a interesting expression. They said it's a vital tool to turn things around.
It was vital tool to turn things around. It was vital tool to turn things around. It was a very interesting expression. They a very interesting expression. They a very interesting expression, they didn't say great bet. They just said it's didn't say great bet. They just said it's didn't say great bet. They just said it's a vital tool.
Mr. Trump to turn things a vital tool. Mr. Trump to turn things a vital tool. Mr. Trump to turn things around around around especially the drug traffic because it's especially the drug traffic because it's especially the drug traffic because it's very tough and we can build that wall. So very tough and we can build that wall.
So very tough and we can build that wall so easily, easily easily and by the way Mexico is gonna pay for and by the way Mexico is gonna pay for and by the way Mexico is gonna pay for the wall. You know, just just to catch the wall, you know, just just to catch the wall, you know, just just to catch they're gonna pay for the way and I got they're gonna pay for the way and I got they're gonna pay for the way.
And I got great, great, great. We got great marks on the - on the speech. We got great marks on the - on the speech. We got great marks on the - on the speech the other night and everyone did the other night and everyone did the other night and everyone did, everybody did so great. Everybody did so great.
Everybody did so great. We had such that by the way, after second, we had such that by the way, after second, we had such that by the way after second, the Republican National Convention was the Republican National Convention was the Republican National Convention was such a tremendous success. It was so such a tremendous success.
It was so such a tremendous success. It was so great. I mean, we had a couple of people, great. I mean, we had a couple of people, great. I mean we had a couple of people that I think probably destroyed their that I think probably destroyed their that I think probably destroyed their careers. But who knows, but - but honestly careers but who knows, but - but honestly careers but who knows but - but honestly though, but honestly that was such an though.
But honestly that was such an though. But honestly that was such an incredible success and look at what's incredible success. And look at what's incredible success and look at what's going on in Philadelphia that was such a going on in Philadelphia that was such a going on in Philadelphia that was such a beautiful deal.
The city of Cleveland was beautiful deal. The city of Cleveland was beautiful deal, the city of Cleveland was great and the law enforcement was great and the law enforcement was great and the law enforcement was unbelievable, unbelievable, unbelievable. We had no riots. We had no nothing, it was - we had no riots.
We had no - nothing, it was - we had no riots. We had no, nothing. It was unbelievable. I'll never forget it as unbelievable. I'll never forget it as unbelievable. I'll never forget it. As long as I live, it was unbelievable. And - and I made a speech and I have to tell and I made a speech and I have to tell and I made a speech and I have to tell you, because I figured this would not you because I figured this would not you because I figured This would not because I could - if I made a speech, if I - because I could if I made a speech if I - because I could.
If I made a speech, if I - if I gave the Gettysburg Address as if I gave the Gettysburg Address as if I gave the Gettysburg Address as given as good as anybody could possibly given as good as anybody could possibly given as good as anybody could possibly Get I figured you know, you always get get, I figured you know, you always get get, I figured you know, you always get nakey always get enough nakey always get enough nakey always get enough.
I got great reviews on this speech. I got - I got great reviews on this speech. I got - I got great reviews on this speech. I got great reviews, great reviews, great reviews. We got standing ovations, some people we got standing ovations, some people we got standing ovations. Some people said, well, the speech was a little long said, well, the speech was a little long said, well, the speech was a little long.
That's because we had 26 or 27 minutes. That's because we had 26 or 27 minutes. That's because we had 26 or 27 minutes of like standing ovations we had of like standing ovations we had of like standing ovations. We had applause and I had a great time doing it. Applause and I had a great time doing it. Applause and I had a great time doing it because I'm talking about something that because I'm talking about something that because I'm talking about something that I love, we're in a movement folks.
This is - I love we're in a movement folks. This is - I love we're in a movement folks. This is a movement. This isn't just - I love what a movement. This isn't just - I love what a movement. This isn't just - I love what we're doing together, right? I love, I love we're doing together, right? I love. I love we're doing together, right?
I love - I love what we're doing together. I love it and what we're doing together, I love it and what we're doing together, I love it. And what really - what I have to say is this, what really - what I have to say is this, what really - what I have to say is this. So Hillary Clinton has bad judgment. So Hillary Clinton has bad judgment.
So Hillary Clinton has bad judgment. She shouldn't have picked this guy big, she shouldn't have picked this guy big. She shouldn't have picked this guy. Big mistake because he is the exact opposite mistake because he is the exact opposite mistake because he is the exact opposite what all of the Bernie people want now what all of the Bernie people want now what all of the Bernie people want now if he got Two percent of the vote or if he got two percent of the vote or if he got two percent of the vote or five percent of the vote or twenty five percent of the vote or twenty five percent of the vote or twenty percent of the vote, She's - but you know percent of the vote, she's - but you know percent of the vote, she's - but you know what, he almost beat her if the system, what he almost beat her if the system what he almost beat her if the system wasn't gamed if the system Wasn't gamed wasn't gamed if the system wasn't gamed wasn't gamed if the system wasn't gamed, he would have been her, he would have, he would have been her, he would have, he would have been her, he would have beaten her now.
Now think of this so beaten her now. Now think of this so beaten her now. Now think of this. So instead of picking somebody and you - instead of picking somebody and you instead of picking somebody and you don't have to go with Pocahontas, you don't have to go with Pocahontas. You don't have to go with Pocahontas.
You have to go that far who, by the way, who have to go that far, who, by the way, who have to go that far, who, by the way, who hasn't done anything, she's the worst. She hasn't done anything. She's the worst. She hasn't done anything. She's the worst she is the worst senator at the US Senate is the worst senator at the US Senate is the worst senator at the US Senate.
You know she's got a fresh mouth. I bet you know she's got a fresh mouth. I bet you know she's got a fresh mouth. I bet she's got nothing going, she has got she, she's got nothing going, she has got she, she's got nothing going. She has got - she has done nothing in the US Senate but has done nothing in the US Senate but has done nothing in the US Senate, but you don't have to pick her.
But you could - you don't have to pick her. But you could - you don't have to pick her, but you could have picked a liberal person and we have picked a liberal person and we have picked a liberal person and we understand it what we can live with it, understand it what we can live with. It understand it what we can live with it and you know she could have had part of and you know she could have had part of and you know she could have had part of unity instead they have thousands and unity instead they have thousands and unity.
Instead, they have thousands and thousands of people going crazy because thousands of people going crazy because thousands of people going crazy because she didn't pick somebody representative. She didn't pick somebody representative. She didn't pick somebody representative. She didn't pick somebody representative.
She didn't pick somebody representative. She didn't pick somebody representative what's going on, let's - let's go look what's going on. Let's - let's go look what's going on. Let's - let's go look again, she's got bad judgment whether again, she's got bad judgment, whether again, she's got bad judgment, whether it's Libya, it's Libya, it's Libya, whether it's Benghazi, whether it's at - whether it's Benghazi, whether it's at, whether it's Benghazi, whether it's at night with the Calls with the calls night with the calls, with the calls night, with the calls with the calls, everybody's calling the only call, she - everybody's calling the only call.
She - everybody's calling the only call she answers is her friend, calls. She picks answers is her friend, calls. She picks answers is her friend, calls. She picks that one up, but she doesn't pick up the that one up, but she doesn't pick up the that one up, but she doesn't pick up the calls to help. She's got bad judgment calls to help.
She's got bad judgment calls to help. She's got bad judgment. Bernie Sanders said she's got bad. Bernie Sanders said she's got bad. Bernie Sanders said she's got bad judgment. She's got bad judgment. When it judgment, she's got bad judgment. When it judgment, she's got bad judgment when it came to picking a vice presidential came to picking a vice presidential, came to picking a vice presidential candidate for that side of the party candidate for that side of the party candidate for that side of the party.
I actually just says Mike Pence, I said I actually just says Mike Pence, I said I actually just says Mike Pence, I said Mike, do you think she's going to be - Mike, do you think she's going to be - Mike, do you think she's going to be forced To change, because honestly now I forced to change because honestly now I forced to change because honestly now I wouldn't pick him, I wouldn't pick him, wouldn't pick him, I wouldn't pick him, wouldn't pick him.
I wouldn't pick him for a different reason though. You know for a different reason though, you know for a different reason though, you know why? I wouldn't pick him why I wouldn't pick him why I wouldn't pick him. So Mike Pence in Indiana has done an so Mike Pence in Indiana has done an so Mike Pence in.
Indiana has done an unbelievable job, a triple a bond rating, unbelievable job a triple a bond rating, unbelievable job a triple a bond rating, so many different things. So many different things, so many different things, job creation, top and virtually every job creation, top and virtually every job creation, top and virtually every category right towards the top at the category, right towards the top at the category, right towards the top, at the top, listen, To this, during Tim Kane's top listen to this, during Tim Kane's top listen to this, during Tim Kane's tenure as governor of Virginia plus he's tenure as governor of Virginia plus he's tenure as governor of Virginia plus he's not very popular.
I thought that I would not very popular. I thought that I would not very popular. I thought that I would see Paul saying is at 85 percent and see Paul saying is at 85 percent and see Paul saying is at 85 percent and Trump is going to lose Virginia, I'm Trump is going to lose Virginia, I'm Trump is going to lose Virginia.
I'm gonna, he people don't even like the guy gonna, he people don't even like the guy gonna, he people don't even like the guy and he let in anyone. We'd weird little and he let in anyone. We'd weird little and he let in anyone. We'd weird little dude there. I don't know what's going on dude there. I don't know what's going on dude there.
I don't know what's going on with him during Tim Kane's ten years with him during Tim Kane's ten years with him during Tim Kane's, ten years governor of Virginia from 2006 to 2010, governor of Virginia from 2006 to 2010, governor of Virginia from 2006 to 2010. The unemployment rate of the state, more the unemployment rate of the state, more the unemployment rate of the state more than doubled.
So I immediately went back than doubled. So I immediately went back than doubled. So I immediately went back to my statistician. I said, listen, do me a to my statistician, I said, listen, do me a to my statistician, I said, listen, do me a favor, favor favor. Will you please check it, came back, he will you please check it, came back.
He will you please check it, came back. He said, hey, maybe he's wrong, but more than said, hey, maybe he's wrong, but more than said, hey, maybe he's wrong, but more than doubled. This is your great governor doubled this is your great governor doubled this is your great governor right now. Governor Mike Pence cut right now.
Governor Mike Pence cut right now. Governor Mike Pence cut unemployment rate from 8.4 percent to unemployment rate from 8.4 percent to unemployment rate from 8.4 percent to less than 5 %, quickly less than 5 %, quickly less than 5 % quickly since 2013. Indiana's gone from 31st in since 2013. Indiana's gone from 31st in since 2013. Indiana's gone from 31st in the nation for veterans unemployment to the nation for veterans unemployment to the nation for veterans unemployment to second.
And it's going to go to first, second and it's going to go to first, second and it's going to go to first, okay, veterans unemployment during Tim, okay. Veterans unemployment during Tim, okay. Veterans unemployment during Tim Kaine, that's the guy that bad judgment Kaine, that's the guy that bad judgment Kaine, that's the guy that bad judgment, crooked Hillary Clinton, bad judgment, crooked, Hillary Clinton, bad judgment, crooked, Hillary Clinton bad judgment such major.
We can't have another such major. We can't have another such major, we can't have another president with bad judgment. We can't do president with bad judgment. We can't do president with bad judgment. We can't do it during Tim Kane's tenure as governor it during Tim Kane's tenure as governor it. During Tim Kane's tenure as governor the state of Virginia lost 60,000, the state of Virginia lost 60,000, the state of Virginia lost 60,000 manufacturing jobs, now Indiana gained manufacturing jobs.
Now Indiana gained manufacturing jobs. Now Indiana gained 30,000. Now it's a different time and 30,000 now it's a different time and 30,000. Now it's a different time and different everything he was - you notice different everything he was - you notice different everything he was - you notice, I'm not comparing, they're not because I'm not comparing, they're not because I'm not comparing, they're not because you'll say, well, one was here who Owns you'll say, well one was here who owns you'll say, well, one was here who owns that.
But I'll tell you if Mike Pence or that. But I'll tell you if Mike Pence or that. But I'll tell you if Mike Pence or me was running Virginia, what do great me was running Virginia, what do great me was running Virginia, what do great this guy did a lousy job. You know why this guy did a lousy job. You know why this guy did a lousy job.
You know why he's a political hack. That's why he's a - he's a political hack. That's why he's a - he's a political hack. That's why he's a political hack. Look, what he's done. Look, political hack. Look what he's done. Look, political hack, look what he's done, look what he's done. He's always been in what he's done.
He's always been in what he's done. He's always been in politics, he likes politics, he wants to politics, he likes politics, he wants to politics, he likes politics, he wants to be in politics, always okay, during Tim, be in politics, always okay, during Tim be in politics, always okay. During Tim Kaine, ten years, governor Virginia, it Kaine ten years, governor Virginia, it Kaine ten years, governor Virginia, it averaged almost no GDP growth and averaged almost no GDP growth and averaged almost no GDP growth.
And Indiana, as you know is doing great. I - Indiana, as you know, is doing great. I - Indiana, as you know, is doing great. I mean, think of it. Here's a beauty, okay? Mean, think of it. Here's a beauty, okay? Mean, think of it. Here's a beauty, okay? Nobody is going to vote for Tim Kaine. Nobody is going to vote for Tim Kaine.
Nobody is going to vote for Tim Kaine when you hear this one. Okay. Tim Kaine I when you hear this one, okay, Tim Kaine I when you hear this one, okay, Tim Kaine, I never - I never even heard of this guy, but never I never even heard of this guy, but never I never even heard of this guy. But that's okay, that's okay, that's okay.
Less than a week after Tim King became less than a week after Tim King became less than a week after Tim King became governor of Virginia one week. He governor of Virginia, one week, he governor of Virginia one week. He proposed a nearly four billion dollar proposed, a nearly four billion dollar proposed, a nearly four billion dollar tax increase, tax increase tax increase four billion including a tax increase on people including a tax increase on people including a tax increase on people earning as little as $ 17,000 a year, he earning as little as $ 17,000 a year, he earning as little as $ 17,000 a year.
He tried to pass transportation reform, he tried to pass transportation reform, he tried to pass transportation reform, he failed whereas Mike Pence had tremendous failed whereas Mike Pence had tremendous failed whereas Mike Pence had tremendous look. I mean the whole thing is, look, I mean the whole thing is, look, I mean the whole thing is ridiculous, ridiculous, ridiculous.
So a four billion dollar tax increases, so a four billion dollar tax increases. So a four billion dollar tax increases first week. Do we want this as a first week? Do we want this as a first week? Do we want this as a president now you know, look hopefully president now you know look hopefully president, now you know look, hopefully we're not too worried about it.
I will. We're not too worried about it. I will - we're not too worried about it. I will say this. Virginia has lost one in three, say this Virginia has lost one in three, say this. Virginia has lost one in three manufacturing jobs since bill clinton manufacturing jobs since bill clinton manufacturing jobs.
Since bill clinton e's are my statisticians. A great signed e's are my statisticians. A great signed e's are my statisticians. A great signed the agreement to put China into the - the agreement to put China into the - the agreement to put China into the World Trade Organization. Don't forget he World Trade Organization, don't forget he World Trade Organization, don't forget he did that.
But Bill Clinton signed did that, but Bill Clinton signed did that, but Bill Clinton signed something that was the worst trade bill, something that was the worst trade bill, something that was the worst trade bill ever in the history of this country, okay? Ever in the history of this country, okay, ever in the history of this country, okay, in the history of this country in the history of this country in the history of this country, NAFTA that was built then people don't NAFTA that was built then people don't NAFTA. That was built then people don't realize.
I'll tell you a little joke, see, realize, I'll tell you a little joke, see, realize, I'll tell you a little joke, see how hot it is. Everyone, everyone's how hot it is. Everyone, everyone's how hot it is. Everyone, everyone's sweating and soaking wet, right, here's sweating and soaking wet right, here's sweating and soaking wet, right?
Here's the difference. I wouldn't pay the hotel. The difference. I wouldn't pay the hotel. The difference. I wouldn't pay the hotel bill. I'd say we're in a hotel. We're in a bill, I'd say we're in a hotel, we're in a bill, I'd say we're in a hotel, we're in a ballroom and you know what, now these are ballroom and you know what now these are.
Ballroom and you know what, now these are grown companies, we're in a ballroom and grown companies. We're in a ballroom and grown companies. We're in a ballroom. And if we're in a ballroom, it's not supposed - if we're in a ballroom, it's not supposed - if we're in a ballroom, it's not supposed to be so hot that everybody in the - to be so hot that everybody in the - to be so hot that everybody in the Audience is using as a fan, so what they audience is using as a fan.
So what they audience is using as a fan. So what they do is they turn - the air-conditioning do is they turn - the air-conditioning do is they turn the air-conditioning down because they saved money. So then I down because they saved money. So then I down because they saved money. So then I would not pay them.
And you know what, I would not pay them and you know what, I would not pay them and you know what I do, I pay my bills so fast with somebody do I pay my bills so fast with somebody, do I pay my bills so fast with Somebody good with somebody average, I pay them good with somebody average, I pay them good with somebody average.
I pay them okay with somebody great, a lot of times, okay, with somebody great, a lot of times, okay, with somebody great, a lot of times I give bonuses, but here we are in a - I give bonuses, but here we are in a - I give bonuses, but Here we are in a ballroom and I'm like - I feel like I'm in ballroom and I'm like - I feel like I'm in ballroom and I'm like - I feel like I'm in a sauna.
Okay, right, right? A sauna. Okay, right, right. A sauna. Okay, right, right. So I don't know what hotel this is, but - so I don't know what hotel this is, but - so I don't know what hotel this is, but you want to try. Turning on the - you want to try - turning on the - you want to try. Turning on the air-conditioner, we're not gonna get your air-conditioner, we're not gonna get your air-conditioner, we're not gonna get your pay this paper, is it, am I right?
It's hot pay this paper, is it, am I right? It's hot pay this paper, is it, am I right? It's hot. Just so you know, I'm really good at this just so you know, I'm really good at this just so you know, I'm really good at this business. You make a lot more money if business you make a lot more money. If business you make a lot more money.
If you own a hotel and you let people, you own a hotel and you let people, you own a hotel and you let people suffer and don't turn on, suffer and don't turn on suffer and don't turn on air-conditioning. You make a lot more air-conditioning. You make a lot more air-conditioning, you make a lot more money.
You would be surprised at how much money you would be surprised at, how much money you would be surprised at, how much it cost, but this is ridiculous. And so it cost, but this is ridiculous. And so it cost, but this is ridiculous. And so then there'll be an article Donald Trump, then there'll be an article Donald Trump.
Then there'll be an article Donald Trump refuses to pay the bill course and you refuses to pay the bill course and you refuses to pay the bill course. And you know what the smart people say Trump is, know what the smart people say. Trump is know what the smart people say. Trump is smart. The other people would say, oh, smart, the other people would say, oh, smart.
The other people would say, oh, isn't that terrible? Okay. Isn't that terrible? Okay. Isn't that terrible? Okay. I think the ballroom and the people that I think the ballroom and the people that I think the ballroom and the people that own this hotel should be ashamed of own this hotel should be ashamed of own.
This hotel should be ashamed of themselves, right. So look, look so themselves right, so look, look so themselves right. So look, look, so Virginia lost one in three, manufacturing Virginia lost one in three, manufacturing Virginia lost one in three manufacturing jobs since the Bill Clinton, bill Hillary jobs since the Bill Clinton, bill Hillary jobs.
Since the Bill Clinton, bill Hillary supported China's entry into WTO, Roanoke supported China's entry into WTO. Roanoke supported China's entry into WTO, Roanoke, which is a beautiful place by the way, which is a beautiful place by the way, which is a beautiful place by the way has lost one. And I've been here many has lost one and I've been here many has lost one and I've been here many times, has lost one in 3. Manufacturing times has lost one in 3. Manufacturing times has lost one in 3 manufacturing jobs ok, since the Clinton disasters last jobs ok since the Clinton disasters last jobs ok, since the Clinton disasters last year, the US trade deficit with TPP year, the US trade deficit with TPP year, the US trade deficit.
With TPP countries, I mean I could go into this I countries, I mean I could go into this I countries, I mean I could go into this, I could read this stuff to you. It gets a - could read this stuff to you. It gets a - could read this stuff to you. It gets a little boring after all, but it's all the little boring after all, but it's all the little boring after all, but it's all the same thing.
Same thing, same thing we have. Hillary Clinton wanted to. We have Hillary Clinton wanted to - we have Hillary Clinton wanted to approve TPP, that's trans-pacific approve TPP, that's trans-pacific approve TPP, that's trans-pacific partnership. And then I announce that I'm partnership and then I announce that I'm partnership and then I announce that I'm against it.
And then she heard me making against it and then she heard me making against it and then she heard me making a speech. This is what I've heard a, a speech. This is what I've heard a, a speech. This is what I've heard a friend of mine told me and I basically friend of mine told me and I basically friend of mine told me and I basically said the various reasons including said the various reasons including said the various reasons including monetary manipulation, currency, monetary Manipulation, currency, monetary manipulation, currency manipulation, etc.
Why it's no good why it manipulation, etc. Why it's no good why it manipulation, etc. Why it's no good why it will be another NAFTA but maybe even will be another NAFTA but maybe even will be another NAFTA. But maybe even worse, it can't be worse, but it'll be as worse. It can't be worse, but it'll be as worse.
It can't be worse, but it'll be as bad. Ok, different countries, but it'll be bad, ok different countries, but it'll be bad, ok different countries, but it'll be as bad and she heard me and she said, oh, as bad and she heard me and she said, oh, as bad. And she heard me and she said, oh, he'll kill me in the debate.
So what he'll kill me in the debate, so what he'll kill me in the debate. So what happened is she all of a sudden came out happened, is she all of a sudden came out happened, is she all of a sudden came out against TPP, but as soon as you're against TPP, but as soon as you're against TPP. But as soon as you're sitting there, she's going to approve TPP sitting there.
She's going to approve TPP sitting there. She's going to approve TPP. If she won, she will approve it. She'll - if she won, she will approve it. She'll - if she won, she will approve it. She'll make a change, make a change, make a change. She'll make a Commerce, you'll say move, she'll make a Commerce, you'll say move, she'll make a Commerce, you'll say move that come, oh, now I can do it.
Ok, folks that come, oh, now I can do it. Ok folks that come, oh, now I can do it ok folks, six thousand pages of material that most six thousand pages of material that most six thousand pages of material that most people haven't read. People haven't read, people haven't read, it is a disaster. Trans-pacific it is a disaster, trans-pacific, it is a disaster.
Trans-pacific partnership is a disaster. You can't let - partnership is a disaster. You can't let partnership is a disaster. You can't let it happen. We will never let it happen. I it happen. We will never let it happen. I it happen, we will never let it happen. I will never ever let it happen and I will never ever let it happen and I will never ever let it happen and I don't want to make deals with many, don't want to make deals with many, don't want to make deals with many countries.
I want to do one on one deals countries I want to do one on one deals countries I want to do one on one deals, one on one, you got to see this deal, it's one on one, you got to see this deal, it's one on one. You got to see this deal, it's like a fancy jigsaw puzzle lines going like a fancy jigsaw puzzle lines going like a fancy jigsaw puzzle lines going here here there.
So, if one of the country here here there, so if one of the country here here there, so if one of the country misbehaves you can't do anything cuz you misbehaves you can't do anything cuz you misbehaves you can't do anything cuz you sort of locked up Into this very complex sort of locked up into this very complex sort of locked up into this very complex agreement.
And believe me, it's just like agreement and believe me, it's just like agreement and believe me, it's just like Obamacare, thousands of pages and nobody Obamacare, thousands of pages and nobody Obamacare, thousands of pages. And nobody in Congress read it. And now it's a - in Congress read it and now it's a in Congress read it and now it's a disaster and we will repeal it and disaster and we will repeal it and disaster and we will repeal it and replace it with something fabulous, okay, replace it With something fabulous, okay, replace it with something fabulous, okay, all right.
But - but we're going to have something, but - but we're going to have something, but - but we're going to have something that's going to be very special that's going to be very special. That's going to be very special. And I have to tell you, I appreciate your - and I have to tell you. I appreciate your - and I have to tell you.
I appreciate your being here and I really wish I being here and I really wish I being here and I really wish I appreciate it. Thank you. Thank you. Thank appreciate it. Thank you. Thank you. Thank appreciate it. Thank you. Thank you. Thank you. Thank you. And I appreciate the folks you thank you and I appreciate the folks you thank you and I appreciate the folks in the room next door, which is almost as in the room next door, which is almost as in the room next door, which is almost as big As this and it's packed also and big as this and it's packed also and big as this and it's packed also and even more than you folks.
I appreciate even more than you folks. I appreciate even more than you folks. I appreciate the people standing outside at 104. The people standing outside at 104, the people standing outside at 104, they're dying, they're dying. Although I - they're dying, they're dying. Although I - they're dying, they're dying.
Although I venture to say that they're more venture to say that they're more venture to say that they're more comfortable than I am right now, it's comfortable than I am right now. It's comfortable than I am right now. It's probably - I think it's actually cooler probably. I think it's actually cooler probably I think it's actually cooler outside than it is in this damn ballroom outside than it is in this damn ballroom outside than it is in this damn ballroom, ridiculous, ridiculous, ridiculous rejected rejected rejected.
But you know what, I'll tell you, you know, but you know what I'll tell you, you know, but you know what, I'll tell you, you know what, I love look at his robe, it's back what I love look at his robe, it's back what I love look At his robe it's back, you know what I love and the other roads, you know what I love and the other roads, you know what I love and the other roads packed what I love nobody left out one packed what I love, nobody left out one packed.
What I love, nobody left out one person, I always watch the doors. If I see person, I always watch the doors. If I see person, I always watch the doors. If I see doors started to open, people pouring out, doors started to open, people pouring out doors, started to open people pouring out. I usually stop, but that never happens.
I usually stop but that never happens. I usually stop but that never happens with me never ever. But - but I stopped with me never ever, but - but I stopped with me, never ever, but - but I stopped nobody lives because you know what, we're - nobody lives because you know what we're - nobody lives because you know what we're in this together.
We're in this together in this together. We're in this together in this together. We're in this together. This is a movement. This is a movement. This is a movement. So Time magazine just did another cover. So Time magazine just did another cover. So Time magazine just did another cover. I talked about it, you saw the one from - I talked about it, you saw the one from - I talked about it, you saw the one from the back of my head, right?
It's pretty the back of my head, right? It's pretty the back of my head, right, it's pretty full back there, you know could be could full back there, you know could be could full back there, you know could be, could be better, could be better, but not bad, be better, could be better, but not Bad be better, could be better, but not bad, but a picture from the back of my head, but a picture from the back of my head.
But a picture from the back of my head, the guy was standing right over me with the guy was standing right over me with the guy was standing right over me with a camera like this. I studied that a camera like this. I studied that a camera like this, I studied that picture very close. I didn't read the picture very close.
I didn't read the picture very close. I didn't read the story, but I did study the picture. No, I story, but I did study the picture. No, I story, but I did study the picture. No, I think that's number five or six that think that's number five or six that think that's number five or six that we've had.
So I think I've had to - in my - we've had - so I think I've had to in my - we've had - so I think I've had to in my lifetime and five or six in the last few lifetime and five or six in the last few lifetime and five Or six, in the last few months where you know we had this months where, you know we had this months where, you know we had this incredible thing going on and they incredible thing going on and they incredible thing going on.
And they called it a movement. And Bill O'Reilly called it a movement, and Bill O'Reilly called it a movement, and Bill O'Reilly calls it him. He's never seen anything, calls it him. He's never seen anything calls it him. He's never seen anything like he said in his professional career like he said in his professional career, like he said in his professional career in his whole lifetime in his whole lifetime in his whole lifetime.
He actually said this is the single he actually said, this is the single he actually said this is the single greatest political phenomena that is greatest political phenomena. That is greatest political phenomena that is ever witnessed. And Brit Hume said and a ever witnessed. And Brit Hume said and a ever witnessed and Brit Hume said and a lot of people, lot of people, lot of people and I really mean this, it's not about me and I really mean this, it's not about me.
And I really mean this, it's not about me, it's about you. There's - there. I'm a - it's about you. There's - there. I'm a - it's about you. There's - there. I'm a messenger. There's a group of people in messenger. There's a group of people in messenger. There's a group of people in this country that's massive.
You know, this country that's massive. You know, this country that's massive. You know, they used to call it a silent majority. I - they used to call it a silent majority. I - they used to call it a silent majority. I don't use the term. It's a noisy majority, don't use the term. It's a noisy majority, don't use the term.
It's a noisy majority because we've had it. We've had it with - because we've had it, we've had it with - because we've had it, we've had it with the Iran deal. We've had it with our - the Iran deal. We've had it with our - the Iran deal. We've had it with our depleted military. We've had it with no depleted military.
We've had it with no depleted military. We've had it with no borders. We've had it with education borders. We've had it with education borders. We've had it with education, where we're ranked right near the bottom where we're ranked right near the bottom where we're ranked right near the bottom. We're doing horribly.
We've had it where we're doing horribly. We've had it where we're doing horribly. We've had it where they want to essentially abolish your - they want to essentially abolish your - they want to essentially abolish your Second Amendment. You have no protection. Second Amendment, you have no protection. Second Amendment, you have no protection for yourself, all right.
We've had - and by for yourself, all right, we've had - and by for yourself, all right? We've had - and by the way, the NRA endorsed me and they're the way the NRA endorsed me and they're the way the NRA endorsed me and they're great people, 100 %. And the evangelicals great people, 100 % and the evangelicals great people, 100 % and the evangelicals.
How many evangelicals do we have in here? How many evangelicals do we have in here? How many evangelicals do we have in here? You better get out and vote because you you better get out and vote because you you better get out and vote because you didn't vote for Romney and you better didn't vote for Romney and you better didn't vote for Romney and you better get out and vote For me, you know we have get out and vote for me.
You know we have get out and vote for me. You know we have the Johnson amendment where Lyndon, the Johnson amendment where Lyndon, the Johnson amendment where Lyndon Johnson who is very powerful, put an Johnson who is very powerful, put an Johnson who is very powerful, put an amendment where basically our pastors or amendment where basically Our pastors or amendment where basically our pastors or ministers and all religions, they don't ministers and all religions, they don't ministers and all religions they don't have the right to speak up.
Then I had - I have the right to speak up then. I had - I have the right to speak up then. I had - I had a meeting, I was telling Franklin had a meeting. I was telling Franklin had a meeting. I was telling Franklin Graham was a great guy. I was telling Graham was a great guy. I was telling Graham was a great guy.
I was telling Jerry Falwell Jr, who's a great guy, great. Jerry Falwell Jr, who's a great guy, great. Jerry Falwell Jr, who's a great guy? Great guy. Guy, guy. I mean, so many - we had a meeting where we - I mean, so many - we had a meeting where we - I mean, so many, we had a meeting where we had 50 to 60 pastors ministers and they had 50 to 60 pastors ministers and they had 50 to 60 pastors ministers and they were saying we love you and they were were saying we love you and they were were saying we love you and they were praying and it was like this incredible praying.
And it was like this incredible praying and it was like this incredible scene. And I said, okay, well folks can you scene and I said, okay, well folks can you scene and I said okay, well folks can you endorse me? Well, we can't do that. Why endorse me? Well, we can't do that. Why endorse me? Well, we can't do that, why?
Because we'll lose our tax-exempt status because we'll lose our tax-exempt status because we'll lose our tax-exempt status. I said why now? Nobody brought this up to. I said why now. Nobody brought this up to, I said why now, nobody brought this up to me. They were living with it. Nobody was me, they were living with it.
Nobody was me, they were living with it, nobody was gonna go find it. I said why do you lose gonna go find it? I said why do you lose gonna go find it? I said why do you lose your taxes? Well, we're not allowed to your taxes. Well, we're not allowed to your taxes. Well, we're not allowed to speak and I said, wait and I looked into speak and I said, wait and I looked into speak and I said wait and I looked into it.
I said, whoa, and that was passed by it. I said, whoa. And that was passed by it, I said, whoa. And that was passed by the ultimate politician. Lyndon Johnson I, the ultimate politician, Lyndon Johnson I, the ultimate politician, Lyndon Johnson, I mean it's not like we're dealing with mean. It's not like we're dealing with mean.
It's not like we're dealing with the Pope, the Pope, the Pope, this was Lyndon Johnson smart, tough guy. This was Lyndon Johnson smart, tough guy. This was Lyndon Johnson smart, tough guy. But we're smarter and tougher. But look, but we're smarter and tougher, but look - but we're smarter and tougher. But look, that was passed by a politician because that was passed by a politician because that was passed by a politician because he had problems with some of the - he had problems with some of the - he had problems with some of the churches, churches, churches in Texas.
Where they were going after him in Texas where they were going after him in Texas where they were going after him for good reason and I said wait a minute for good reason and I said wait a minute for good reason and I said wait a minute, Folks, folks, folks and we put in our platform that we're - and we put in our platform that we're - and we put in our platform that we're going to work like hell to get rid of, going to work like hell to get rid of going to work like Hell to get rid of the Johnson amendment because - because the Johnson amendment, because because the Johnson amendment, because because your representatives ministers, pastors, your representatives, ministers, pastors, your representatives ministers, pastors rabbis, they have totally lost their rabbis.
They have totally lost their rabbis. They have totally lost their voice and don't get yourself that's voice and don't get yourself that's voice and don't get yourself. That's what's happening to religion in this, what's happening to religion in this, what's happening to religion in this country because you see the same numbers country because you see the same numbers country because you see the same numbers that I see.
So I think this - if you're - that I see. So I think this - if you're - that I see. So I think this - if you're evangelical of - you're Christian of evangelical of - you're Christian of evangelical of - you're Christian of you're Jewish. If you have religion you, you're Jewish. If you have religion you, you're Jewish, if you have religion, you better go out and vote for Trump because better go out and vote for Trump because better go out and vote for Trump because this is going to be the last chance you - this is going to Be the last chance you - this is going to be the last chance you ever get to get this ring down, okay, ever get to get this ring down, okay, ever get to get this ring down.
Okay, better. So thank you. Thank you. Thank you. Thank you. And I said in my eye, I will say this, I - and I said in my eye, I will say this, I - and I said in my eye, I will say this, I will say this, I said in my speech the will say this, I said in my Speech the will say this, I said in my speech the other night and I meant it, I thank the other night and I meant it.
I thank the other night and I meant it. I thank the evangelicals because I won. I got these evangelicals because I won. I got these evangelicals because I won, I got these tremendous votes. They say Trump can't tremendous votes. They say Trump can't tremendous votes. They say Trump can't win South Carolina, right?
I said why win South Carolina, right? I said why win South Carolina, right? I said why? Because I'd have a piece of tremendous, because I'd have a piece of tremendous, because I'd have a piece of tremendous crowd I won with evangelicals. I want all crowd I won with evangelicals. I want all crowd I won with evangelicals.
I want all over with evangelicals because they get over with evangelicals because they get over with evangelicals because they get it, they're smart, they understand they it, they're smart, they understand they it, they're smart, they understand. They know, I'm not perfect. I'm not perfect, but know, I'm not perfect.
I'm not perfect, but know, I'm not perfect. I'm not perfect, but they know I love them and they know I'm - they know I love them and they know I'm - they know I love them and they know I'm gonna fight for them better than gonna fight for them better than gonna fight for Them better than somebody that is perfect, okay?
I'm gonna somebody that is perfect. Okay. I'm gonna somebody that is perfect. Okay, I'm gonna fight for - and I'm gonna fight for other fight for and I'm gonna fight for other fight for and I'm gonna fight for other religions, I'm gonna fight, I'm gonna religions, I'm gonna fight, I'm gonna religions. I'm gonna fight, I'm gonna fight for people to be able to speak and fight for people to be able to speak and fight for people to be able to speak.
And actually when they said this to me, I was actually when they said this to me, I was actually when they said this to me, I was in an office building very high up and in an office building very high up and in an office building very High up and I'm looking down and I said to these, I'm looking down and I said to these, I'm looking down and I said to these powerful pastors and these powerful men, powerful pastors and these powerful men, powerful pastors and these powerful men and women just powerful People with and women just powerful people with and women just powerful people with tremendous strength and energy and tremendous strength and energy and tremendous strength and energy and conviction.
And they're so there in the conviction and they're so there in the conviction and they're so there. In the Roman, there was beautiful. The voices and Roman, there was beautiful. The voices and Roman, there was beautiful the voices and I said, but that means that you are less I said, but that means that you are less I said, but that means that you are less powerful than those people walking down powerful than those people walking down.
Powerful than those people walking down the street, I pointed to this traitor the street. I pointed to this traitor the street. I pointed to this traitor because they have a right to talk and because they have a right to talk and because they have a right to talk and you don't - you don't have your right to you don't - you don't have your right to you don't - you don't Have your right to talk, okay, and that's our religion, that's talk okay and that's our religion, that's talk okay.
And that's our religion, that's our religion in my case. I'm Presbyterian, our religion, in my case, I'm Presbyterian, our religion, in my case, I'm Presbyterian, I'm Protestant, but - but that's our - I'm Protestant but - but that's our - I'm Protestant but - but that's our religion and my minister who I like a religion and my minister who I like A religion and my minister who I like a lot doesn't have the right to speak lot doesn't have the right to speak, lot doesn't have the right to speak.
We're gonna end that folks, you're gonna, we're gonna end that folks, you're gonna, we're gonna end that folks, you're gonna one chance we're gonna have it. So you one chance we're gonna have it. So you one chance we're gonna have it, so you better go back to your churches and you better go back to your churches and you better go back to your churches and you better get everybody to vote because better get everybody to vote because better get Everybody to vote because four years ago they didn't get up and four years ago they didn't get up and four years ago they didn't get up and they didn't vote for Romney and to this they didn't vote for Romney and to this they didn't vote for Romney And to this day, a lot of people don't understand who day a lot of people don't understand who day a lot of people don't understand who some people do understand it frankly.
But some people do understand it frankly. But some people do understand it frankly. But you better get up and you better vote, you better get up and you better vote, you better get up and you better vote because if you vote, if you think about - because if you vote, if you think about - because if you vote, if you think about It the - if you take Christian Jewish take it the - if you take Christian Jewish take it the - if you take Christian Jewish, take some of the Catholic, take the religions, some of the Catholic, take the religions, some of the Catholic, take the religions, it's bigger than men.
And is bigger than - it's bigger than men and is bigger than - it's bigger than men and is bigger than women, right? It's bigger than men. You women, right? It's bigger than men. You women, right? It's bigger than men. You know men are 50 %, women are 50 %, the know men are 50 %, women are 50 %, the know men are 50 %, women are 50 %, the religion is like what 80 % right religion is like what 80 % right religion is like what 80 %, right, if you get up and vote, we're gonna get - if you get up and vote, we're gonna get - if you get up and vote, we're gonna get rid of that and we're going to free up rid of that and we're going to Free up rid of that and we're going to free up great people to go and speak what they great people to go and speak what they great people to go and speak what they want to speak about and they should be want to speak about.
And they should be want to speak about and they should be able to speak, okay, very important, so able to speak, okay, very important, so able to speak, okay, very important. So just a couple of things and I'd like to just a couple of things. And I'd like to just a couple of things and I'd like to bring mic up just a couple of things.
We bring mic up. Just a couple of things. We bring mic up, just a couple of things. We are going to strengthen our military and are going to strengthen our military and are going to strengthen our military and military's really depleted. It's not good. Military's really depleted. It's not good. Military's really depleted.
It's not good. I didn't want to go into Iraq. We got - I didn't want to go into Iraq, we got - I didn't want to go into Iraq, we got there, I said keep the oil, they didn't there. I said keep the oil, they didn't there. I said keep the oil, they didn't keep the oil. These people don't know keep the oil.
These people don't know keep the oil. These people don't know what they're doing. You know the old days what they're doing, you know the old days what they're doing, you know the old days you're in a war to the victor belong the - you're in a war to the victor belong the - you're in a war to the victor belong the spoils Right today, we had nothing spoils right today.
We had nothing spoils right today. We had nothing trillions of dollars and cause thousands trillions of dollars and cause thousands trillions of dollars and cause thousands and thousands of lives lost. We got and thousands of lives lost. We got and thousands of lives lost. We got nothing, nothing, nothing.
Iraq is a disaster. The Middle East is - Iraq is a disaster. The Middle East is - Iraq is a disaster. The Middle East is worse now than it was 15 years ago by a worse now than it was 15 years ago by a worse now than it was 15 years ago by a factor of 20, okay? We would have done factor of 20, okay? We would have done factor of 20, okay?
We would have done nothing. We would have been much better, nothing we would have been much better, nothing we would have been much better off. We got to build up our military, we off, we got to build up our military, we off, we got to build up our military. We never needed it so much. We never needed, never needed it so much.
We never needed, never needed it so much. We never needed our military so much. So we're going to our military so much. So we're going to our military so much. So we're going to take care of our country, we're going to take care of our country, we're going to take care of our country. We're going to take care of our vets.
We're going to take care of our vets. We're going to take care of our vets. We're going to take care of our people. We're gonna make take care of our people. We're gonna make take care of our people, we're gonna make America great again. And I have to tell America great again and I have to tell America great again.
And I have to tell you one of the really good decisions, you - one of the really good decisions you - one of the really good decisions because I laugh when they say do you, because I laugh when they say do you, because I laugh when they say do You think mr. Trump likes Governor Mike think mr. Trump likes Governor Mike think mr.
Trump likes Governor Mike Pence. I love this guy. He's great, he's Pence. I love this guy. He's great, he's Pence. I love this guy. He's great, he's great and everybody does. I'm getting great and everybody does. I'm getting great and everybody does. I'm getting such great marks and such great reviews such great marks and such great reviews such great marks and such great reviews unlike Hillary.
Did I ask you before, do unlike Hillary, did I ask you before, do unlike Hillary, did I ask you before? Do you think she'll change? He looked at me, you think she'll change. He looked at me, you think she'll change. He looked at me sitting away because it's hard to do sitting away because it's hard to do sitting away because it's hard to do right.
She made before she made before, right? She made before. She made before, right? She made before she made before such a. He actually, I'll tell you, Tim such a he actually, I'll tell you, Tim such a he actually I'll tell you, Tim Kaine stands for the exact opposite of Kaine stands for the exact opposite of Kaine stands for the exact opposite of all of the Bernie Sanders people.
I'm in all of the Bernie Sanders people. I'm in all of the Bernie Sanders people. I'm in his ridiculous what she did. Again bad his ridiculous what she did, again bad his ridiculous what she did. Again, bad judgment. So I'm gonna have Mike say just judgment. So I'm gonna have Mike say just judgment, so I'm gonna have Mike say just a few of the final words and I'm gonna, a few of the final words and I'm gonna, a few of the final words and I'm gonna sit down And watch them, he is some great sit down and watch them.
He is some great sit down and watch them. He is some great person, he's got some wonderful family person, he's got some wonderful family person, he's got some wonderful family and we are having such fun going all and we are having such fun going all and we are having such fun going all over the place. And so Mike can finish over the place and so Mike can finish over the place.
And so Mike can finish off and I want to thank you folks. Thank off and I want to thank you folks. Thank off and I want to thank you folks. Thank you. You you - hey Mike, you know it's funny, some of the - hey, Mike, you know it's funny, some of the - hey, Mike, you know it's funny, some of the great musicians have said never do an great musicians, have said never do an great musicians, have said never do An encore when you get upgraded, so we encore when you get upgraded.
So we encore when you get upgraded. So we definitely look how strong this is definitely look how strong this is definitely look how strong this is everyone standing everyone good now if. Everyone standing everyone good now if everyone standing everyone good. Now if we do an encore, we'll get a couple of - we do an encore, we'll get a couple of - we do an encore, we'll get a couple of bad questions will walk out, they'll say bad questions will walk out.
They'll say bad questions will walk out. They'll say they weren't so great, right? But we'll do - they weren't so great, right? But we'll do. They weren't so great, right? But we'll do it anyway, right, do it anyway. So Mike, was it anyway, right, do it anyway. So Mike, was it anyway right? Do it? Anyway, so Mike was said, just asking if would want to take said, just asking if would want to take said, just asking if would want to take some questions, some questions, some questions, fine, you go ahead, Mike.
Yeah, we've got fine you go ahead, Mike. Yeah, we've got fine you go ahead, Mike. Yeah, we've got how about one more time for Donald Trump, how about one more time for Donald Trump, how about one more time for Donald Trump, everybody bringing the heat today, bringing the real Heat, bringing the real Heat, bringing the real Heat.
They've got some people out here that they've got some people out here that they've got some people out here that have got microphones, get your hand in, have got microphones, get your hand in, have got microphones, get your hand in the air. We'll take a few questions and the air. We'll take a few questions and the air.
We'll take a few questions and ready right here. Okay, right, over here, ready, right here. Okay, right, over here. Ready, right here. Okay, right over here. Yes, ma'am, go ahead. I said go ahead very yes, ma'am. Go ahead. I said go ahead very yes, ma'am. Go ahead. I said go ahead very much. Mr. Trump, thank you.
What do you much mr. Trump? Thank you. What do you much mr. Trump? Thank you. What do you want to do for the youth? How are you want to do for the youth? How are you want to do for the youth? How are you going to make the community safer, Frost going to make the community safer, Frost going to make the community safer Frost, we're going to work one thing we have to - we're going to work one thing we have to - we're going to work.
One thing we have to do for the youth, and it's a question I do for the youth. And it's a question I do for the youth. And it's a question I get asked, Mike more than any other get asked, Mike more than any other get asked. Mike. More than any other question, we have young, fantastic people question. We have young, fantastic people question.
We have young, fantastic people going to college and they're choking on going to college and they're choking on going to college and they're choking on their debt, okay? They're choking on debt, their debt, okay, they're choking on debt. Their debt, okay, they're choking on debt. They haven't started life yet and some they haven't started life yet and some they haven't started life yet and some of them have given up before they of them have given up before they of them have given up before they started because they see no way we're Started because they see no way we're started because they see no way we're gonna work on a plan and we're working gonna work on a plan and we're working gonna work on a plan and we're working on it now so that we can help Young on it now so that we can help young on it now so that we can help young people get through college and not people get through college and not people get through college and not diverge.
I mean some of these kids what diverge, I mean some of these kids what diverge, I mean some of these kids what they're doing is incredible. You know, the they're doing is incredible. You know the they're doing is incredible, you know, the massive depression that's going on massive depression that's going on massive depression that's going on because they see no way of ever being because they see no way of ever being because they see no way of ever being Able to pay it back now, part of that's able to pay it back now, part of that's able to pay it back now, part of that's going to be jobs, but we're working on a going to be jobs, but we're working on a going to be jobs.
But we're working on a plan now to take care of youth with plan now to take care of youth with plan now to take care of youth. With respect to college debt, we're going to respect to college debt. We're going to respect to college debt. We're going to work on a very good plan. We have to - we work on a very good plan.
We have to - we work on a very good plan we have to - we have - and let me tell you, let me tell you have - and let me tell you, let me tell you have - and let me tell you, let me tell you, Donald was very kind of Mentioned my Donald was very kind of mentioned my Donald was very kind of mentioned my wife Karen pence and our recent college wife, Karen pence and our recent college wife, Karen pence.
And our recent college graduate daughter, Charlotte pence are graduate daughter, Charlotte pence are graduate daughter, Charlotte pence are with us today. Would you welcome them with us today, would you welcome them with us today, would you welcome them. And I will tell you the focus on college and I will tell you the focus on college and I will tell you the focus on college debt is something we've been focused on.
Debt is something we've been focused on. Debt is something we've been focused on in the state of Indiana, focusing on in the state of Indiana, focusing on in the state of Indiana, focusing on on-time completion right before your on-time completion, right before your on-time completion, right before your strategy, when we need a president, Who's strategy when we need a president, who's strategy when we need a president who's less than four years, but the best thing less than four years, but the best thing less than four years.
But the best thing Donald Trump will do for the use our Donald Trump will do for the use our Donald Trump will do for the use. Our choice is get this economy moving again. Choice is get this economy moving again. Choice is get this economy moving again and create jobs and opportunities for and create jobs and opportunities for and create jobs and opportunities for young people coming out.
First, school young people coming out first school, young people coming out first school coming out of the trades and coming out coming out of the trades and coming out coming out of the trades and coming out of college. And I want to promise another of college and I want to promise another of college and I want to promise another one.
Yes, go ahead. Thank you, mr. Trump for being here in. Thank you mr. Trump for being here in. Thank you. Mr. Trump for being here in Virginia, and I apologize for the heat, we - Virginia and I apologize for the heat we - Virginia and I apologize for the heat. We didn't have a question for you. Do you didn't have a question for you.
Do you didn't have a question for you, do you own the hotel, sir, if I own this hotel, it own the hotel, sir, if I own this hotel, it own the hotel, sir. If I own this hotel, it would be sixty degrees in here. But mr. would be sixty degrees in here, but mr. would be sixty degrees in here. But mr. Trump with all things, God knows with all Trump with all things, God knows with all Trump with all things, God knows with all things powerful.
We're praying that you things powerful, we're praying that you things powerful. We're praying that you or our president come November the - or our president come November the - or our president come November. The question for you, mr. Trump is will you question for you? Mr. Trump is - will you question for you, mr.
Trump is - will you stand by is a 100 % and do whatever it stand by is a 100 % and do whatever it stand by is a 100 % and do whatever it takes to preserve takes to preserve Takes to preserve nations of God, yes, 100 %. We have to stand nations of God, yes, 100 %. We have to stand nations of God, yes, 100 %. We have to stand by our job 105 by our job 105 by our job 105, yes, yes, hello.
I have one question for - yes, yes, hello. I have one question for - yes, yes, hello. I have one question for you. Mr. Trump, these are usually the you mr. Trump, these are usually the you mr. Trump, these are usually the toughest question, but when you get it toughest question, but when you get it toughest question, but when you get it, what - what's your name son, what's your - what - What's your name son, what's your - what - what's your name son, what's your name, Jacob Jacob Jones name, Jacob, Jacob Jones name, Jacob.
Jacob Jones, Hank. Okay, go ahead. I have one question, Hank. Okay, go ahead. I have one question, Hank. Okay, go ahead. I have one question for you. Mr. Trump now when you are in for you mr. Trump now when you are in for you mr. Trump now when you are in office, what would be the timeline for office? What would be the timeline for office?
What would be the timeline for that wall that you're talking about, Jake? That wall will go up so fast and be Jake. That wall will go up so fast and be Jake. That wall will go up so fast and be so big and powerful and as good-looking. So big and powerful and as good-looking so big and powerful and as good-looking as we can make it that your head will as we can make it that your head will as we can make it that your head will spin, spin spin okay, believe me, it's gon Na go up fast, okay.